California statutes. Vehicle Code
Any person who has access to confidential or restricted information from the department shall establish procedures to protect the confidentiality of those records. If any confidential or restricted information is released to any agent of a person authorized to obtain information, the person shall require the agent to take all steps necessary to ensure confidentiality and prevent the release of any information to a third party. No agent shall obtain or use any confidential or restricted records for any purpose other than the reason the information was requested.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 880, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

1808.48.

Notwithstanding any other law, no government agency or department, law enforcement agency, commercial entity, or other person shall obtain, access, use, or otherwise disclose, noncriminal history information maintained by the department, for the purpose of immigration enforcement, as defined in subdivision (f) of Section 7284.4. of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 482, Sec. 6.   (AB 1766)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

1808.5.

Except as provided in Section 22511.58, all records of the department relating to the physical or mental condition of any person, and convictions of any offense involving the use or possession of controlled substances under Division 10 (commencing with Section 11000) of the Health and Safety Code not arising from circumstances involving a motor vehicle, are confidential and not open to public inspection.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 828, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

1808.51.

Notwithstanding Sections 1808.5 and 12800.5, any of the following may obtain copies of fullface engraved pictures or photographs of individuals directly from the department:

(a) The Bureau of Real Estate, as a department, individually, or through its staff, for purposes of enforcing the Real Estate Law (Part 1 (commencing with Section 10000) of Division 4 of the Business and Professions Code) or the Subdivided Lands Law (Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 11000) of Part 2 of Division 4 of the Business and Professions Code).

(b) The city attorney of a city and county and his or her investigators for purposes of performing functions related to city and county operations.

(c) The Bureau of Automotive Repair, as a department, individually, or through its staff, for purposes of enforcing the Automotive Repair Act (Chapter 20.3 (commencing with Section 9880) of Division 3 of the Business and Professions Code) or the Motor Vehicle Inspection Program (Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 44000) of Part 5 of Division 26 of the Health and Safety Code).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 503, Sec. 4.   (AB 3141)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

1808.6.

(a) In addition to those specified in Section 1808.4, the home address of any of the following persons, that appears in any record of the department, is confidential, if the person requests the confidentiality of that information:

(1) The chairperson, executive officer, commissioners, and deputy commissioners of the Board of Prison Terms.

(2) The chairperson, members, executive director, and hearing representatives of the Youthful Offender Parole Board.

(3) The spouse or children of persons listed in this section, regardless of the spouse’s or child’s place of residence.

(b) The confidential home address of any of the persons listed in subdivision (a) shall not be disclosed to any person, except a court, a law enforcement agency, the State Board of Equalization, or any governmental agency to which, under any provision of law, information is required to be furnished from records maintained by the department.

(c) Any record of the department containing a confidential home address shall be open to public inspection, as provided in Section 1808, if the address is completely obliterated or otherwise removed from the record. The home address shall be withheld from public inspection for three years following termination of office or employment, except with respect to retired peace officers, whose home addresses shall be withheld from public inspection permanently upon request of confidentiality at the time the information would otherwise be opened. The department shall inform any person who requests a confidential home address of the name of the agency that employs the individual whose address was requested.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 880, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

1808.7.

(a) The record of the department relating to the first proceeding and conviction under Section 1803.5 in any 18-month period for completion of a traffic violator school program is confidential, shall not be disclosed to any person, except a court and as provided for in subdivision (b), and shall be used only for statistical purposes by the department. No violation point count shall be assessed pursuant to Section 12810 if the conviction is confidential.

(b) The record of a conviction described in subdivision (a) shall not be confidential if any of the following circumstances applies:

(1) The person convicted holds a commercial driver’s
 license as defined by Section 15210.

(2) The person convicted holds a commercial driver’s license in another state, in accordance with Part 383 of Title 49 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(3) The violation occurred in a commercial motor vehicle, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 15210.

(4) The conviction would result in a violation point count of more than one point pursuant to Section 12810.

(c) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2011.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 2) and added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 599, Sec. 2.5.   (AB 2499)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Section operative July 1, 2011, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

1808.8.

(a) Dismissal of any driver certified pursuant to Section 12517, 12523, or 12523.5, for a cause relating to pupil transportation safety, shall be reported by the carrier to the department within five days of the dismissal date. 

(b) Reinstatement of any driver whose dismissal has been reported under subdivision (a) shall be reported by the carrier to the department within five days of the reinstatement date.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 359, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

1808.9.

(a) Except for retired peace officers whose home address is permanently withheld from public inspection under subdivision (c) of Section 1808.4 or subdivision (c) of Section 1808.6, a person whose home address is confidential in any record of the department under Section 1808.2, 1808.4, or 1808.6 may be required by the department to demonstrate his or her continued eligibility for that confidentiality upon renewal of a driver’s license or identification card issued by the department. Not later than 90 days prior to the expiration of a driver’s license or identification card, the department shall notify the person whose record is confidential of any requirement to demonstrate the continued eligibility.

(b) A person whose driver’s license or identification card is renewed within one year of the first request for address confidentiality under this section shall not be required to demonstrate his or her eligibility for that confidentially again until the subsequent renewal.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 880, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

1808.10.

The record of the department relating to the first proceeding and conviction for a driver licensed with a class A license, class B license, or commercial class C driver’s license in any 18-month period who is allowed, for a traffic offense while operating a vehicle requiring only a class C or a class M license, to complete a course of instruction at a traffic violator school, is not confidential and shall be disclosed for purposes of Title 49 of the Code of Federal Regulations and to insurers by the department for insurance underwriting and rating purposes.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 302, Sec. 1.   (AB 1888)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

1809.

The department may prepare and disseminate information relating to prevention of traffic accidents.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

1810.

(a) Except as provided in Sections 1806.5, 1808.2, 1808.4, 1808.5, 1808.6, 1808.7, 1808.8, and paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 12800.5, the department may permit inspection of information from its records concerning the registration of a vehicle or information from the files of drivers’ licenses at a charge that shall not exceed the actual cost to the department for providing the inspection of the information, including, but not limited to, costs incurred by the department in carrying out subdivision (b), with the charge for the information to be determined by the director. This section does not apply to statistical information of the type previously compiled and distributed by the department.

(b) (1) With respect to the inspection of information concerning the registration of a vehicle or of information from the files of drivers’ licenses, the department shall establish, by regulation, administrative procedures under which a person making a request for that information shall be required to identify themselves and state the reason for making the request. The procedures shall provide for the verification of the name and address of the person making a request for the information, and the department may require the person to produce that information as it determines is necessary to ensure that the name and address of the person is the true name and address. The procedures may provide for a 10-day delay in the release of the requested information. The procedures shall also provide for notification to the
 person to whom the information primarily relates, as to what information was provided and to whom it was provided. The department shall establish, by regulation, a reasonable period of time for which a record of all the foregoing shall be maintained.

(2) The procedures required by paragraph (1) do not apply to a governmental entity, a person or an organization who has applied for and has been issued a requester code by the department, or a court of competent jurisdiction.

(c) With respect to the inspection of information from the files of drivers’ licenses, the department may require both the full name of the driver and either the driver’s license number or date of birth as identifying
 points of the record, except that the department may disclose a record without two identifying points if the department determines that the public interest in disclosure outweighs the public interest in personal privacy.

(d) With respect to the inspection of information from the files of drivers’ licenses, certificates of ownership, and registration cards, the department shall not allow, for a fee or
 otherwise, copying by the public.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 90, Sec. 1.   (AB 398)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

1810.2.

(a) The department may establish commercial requester accounts for individuals or organizations and issue requester codes for the purpose of obtaining information from the department’s files, except as prohibited by Section 1808.21. 

(b) Commercial requester account applications shall include the requester’s name, address, type of business, a specific reason for requesting information, and the name of the person responsible for the business or firm. 

(c) The department shall establish a commercial requester account when it determines that the applicant has a legitimate business need for the information requested and when the applicant files a bond in the amount of fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) and pays a two hundred fifty dollar ($250) filing fee. If the applicant does not request and is not issued a requester code permitting the applicant access to residence address information, only a filing fee of fifty dollars ($50) shall be required with the original application and each biennial renewal application. 

(d) An individual requester code shall be issued for a period not to exceed five years and may be renewed upon application for additional periods not to exceed five years each. 

(e) A requester code may be denied to any person unless the proposed use of the information from department records is related to legitimate business or commercial purposes of that person. A requester code may be canceled immediately if the requested information is used for a purpose other than the purpose for which the requester code was issued.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 579, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

1810.3.

(a) Using the information made available in the accident reports provided to the department by law enforcement agencies under Section 20012, the department may provide information consisting of the following, for each vehicle that is included in those reports:

(1) The license plate number.

(2) The accident report number.

(b) Notwithstanding Section 16005, 20012, or 20014, or any other provision of law, the department may make the information available to a person who has done both of the following:

(1) Established a commercial requester account under Section 1810.2.

(2) Entered into an agreement described under subdivision (c).

(c) The department shall not provide information under this section unless the person requesting the information has entered into an agreement with the department that includes the following stipulations:

(1) The information provided may not be used for the purpose of identifying or contacting any person or for any other purpose, except as specified in paragraph (2).

(2) The information may be used only to identify a vehicle that has been reported to be in a traffic accident.

(3) The law enforcement agency accident report number and license plate number provided under this section shall be used only for the internal verification purposes of the business that receives the information and may not be disclosed to any party other than the department or the Department of the California Highway Patrol.

(4) The requester agrees to investigate and promptly correct any error that is brought to its attention.

(d) Use of the information provided under this section in violation of paragraph (1), (2), or (3) of subdivision (c) is a violation of Sections 1808.45 and 1808.46.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 336, Sec. 1.   Effective August 30, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

1810.5.

The Attorney General, district attorneys, law enforcement agencies, city attorneys and city prosecutors prosecuting misdemeanor actions under Section 41803.5 or 72193 of the Government Code, public defenders, and public defender investigators shall have access, including, but not limited to, telephone access, to the records of the department. For purposes of obtaining a governmental entity requester code from the department, the office of a city attorney or city prosecutor engaged in the prosecution of criminal actions shall be deemed a law enforcement entity.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 299, Sec. 6.   (AB 1418)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

1810.7.

(a) Except as provided in Sections 1806.5, 1808.2, 1808.4, 1808.5, 1808.6, 1808.7, and 1808.21, the department may authorize, by special permit, any person to access the department’s electronic database, as provided for in this section, for the purpose of obtaining information for commercial use.

(b) The department may limit the number of permits issued under this section, and may restrict, or establish priority for, access to its files as the department deems necessary to avoid disruption of its normal operations, or as the department deems is in the best interest of the public.

(c) The department may establish minimum volume levels, audit and security standards, and technological requirements, or any terms and conditions it deems necessary for the permits.

(d) As a condition of issuing a permit under this section, the department shall require each direct-access permittee to file a performance bond or other financial security acceptable to the department, in an amount the department deems appropriate.

(e) The department shall charge fees for direct-access service permits, and shall charge fees pursuant to Section 1810 for any information copied from the files.

(f) The department shall ensure that information provided under this section includes only the public portions of records.

(g) On and after January 1, 1992, the director shall report every three years to the Legislature on the implementation of this section. The report shall include the number and location of direct-access permittees, the volume and nature of direct-access inquiries, procedures the department has taken to ensure the security of its files, and the costs and revenues associated with the project.

(h) The department shall establish procedures to ensure confidentiality of any records of residence addresses and mailing addresses as required by Sections 1808.21, 1808.22, 1808.45, 1808.46, and 1810.2.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 594, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

1811.

The department may sell copies of all or any part of its records at a charge sufficient to pay at least the entire actual cost to the department of the copies, the charge for the records and the conditions under which they may be sold to be determined by the director.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1961, Ch. 216.)
-------------------------------------------

1812.

The department shall not charge for copies of records or for information from its records given to any county, city, any transit operator as defined in Section 99210 of the Public Utilities Code, state department, or the United States government.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 726, Sec. 4.   Operative July 1, 1988, by Sec. 11 of Ch. 726.)
-------------------------------------------

1813.

The director and such officers of the department as he may designate may, upon request, prepare under the seal of the department and deliver without charge a certified copy of any record of the department received or maintained under this code.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

1814.

Any person engaged in the business of examining the records of the department and supplying information relative thereto to the public for compensation shall first obtain a permit from the director. The director shall grant such a permit when he determines that the applicant is qualified and intends in good faith to carry on such business, and when the applicant files with the director a bond in the amount of five thousand dollars ($5,000).

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

1815.

The bond shall be to the satisfaction of the director and shall obligate the principal and sureties to compensate the officers of the department and any other person who may suffer loss or damage by reason of any failure or neglect of the principal, the principal’s agents, or employees to preserve carefully and surrender any records examined in the department and by reason of any act of the principal, the principal’s agents, or employees in respect to the loss, alteration, substitution, or mutilation of any records of the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 517, Sec. 386.)
-------------------------------------------

1816.

Every judge of the juvenile court, juvenile hearing officer, duly constituted referee of a juvenile court, or other person responsible for the disposition of cases involving traffic offenses required to be reported under Section 1803 committed by persons under 18 years of age shall keep a full record of every case in which a person is charged with such a violation, and shall report the offense to the department at its office in Sacramento not more than 30 days after the date on which it was committed, and in no case less than 10 days after adjudication. The report required by this section shall be required for any determination that a minor committed the violation, including any determination that because of the act the minor is a person described in Section 601 or 602 of the Welfare and Institutions Code or that a program of supervision should be instituted for the minor. No report shall be made if it is found that the alleged offense was not committed.

The report required by this section shall be made upon a form furnished by the department and shall contain all necessary information as to the identity of the offender, the arresting agency, the date and nature of the offense, and the date the finding was made.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 149, Sec. 80.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

1817.

Written allegations received by the department from members of the public identifying motor vehicles or other vehicles by license number from which any flaming or glowing substance has been thrown, or discharged, shall be forwarded to the Department of Forestry and Fire Protection together with any information as to the identity of the registered owner of the vehicle as shown by the records of the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 427, Sec. 165.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

1818.

Any record of, or information from any record concerning, an abstract of conviction kept by the department shall contain an appropriate notation indicating the commercial or noncommercial nature or the license plate number of the vehicle involved in the offense.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 683.)
-------------------------------------------

1819.

All records of the department containing information as to the actual mileage of motor vehicles submitted as required by subdivision (b) of Section 4456 and Sections 5900 and 5901 shall be open to inspection by the public during the office hours of the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 180, Sec. 4.   Effective July 11, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

1821.

(a) The department shall establish and maintain a data and monitoring system to evaluate the efficacy of intervention programs for persons convicted of violations of Section 23152 or 23153.

(b) The system may include a recidivism tracking system. The recidivism tracking system may include, but not be limited to, jail sentencing, license restriction, license suspension, level I (first offender) and II (multiple offender) alcohol and drug education and treatment program assignment, alcohol and drug education treatment program readmission and dropout rates, adjudicating court, length of jail term, actual jail or alternative sentence served, type of
 treatment program assigned, actual program compliance status, subsequent crashes related to driving under the influence of alcohol or drugs, and subsequent convictions of violations of Section 23152 or 23153.

(c) The systems described in subdivisions (a) and (b) shall include an evaluation of the efficacy of the increased level of intervention resulting from the act that added this subdivision.

(d) The department shall submit an annual report of its evaluations to the Legislature. The evaluations shall include a ranking of the relative efficacy of criminal penalties, other sanctions, and intervention programs and the various combinations thereof, including, but not limited to, those described in subdivision (c).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 81, Sec. 2.   (AB 2198)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

1822.

The Legislature finds that driving under the influence of alcohol or drugs continues to be a primary safety issue on the state’s highways, and the major cause of traffic deaths. It is imperative that violators who drive while under the influence of alcohol or drugs be fully prosecuted under the law. The Legislature also finds that too often violators have not had their driving records at the Department of Motor Vehicles appropriately updated. Therefore, it is the intent of the Legislature that the department, working with the courts, establish and maintain a data and monitoring system to track violations of driving under the influence of alcohol or drugs, including, but not limited to, violations of Article 1.3 (commencing with Section 23136), Article 1.5 (commencing with Section 23140), and Article 2 (commencing with Section 23152), of Chapter 12 of Division 11. The system shall match arrests for driving under the influence of alcohol or drug violations with convictions reported to the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 224, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

1825.

(a) The department shall conduct a quarterly random audit of applications submitted and processed pursuant to Section 5007 or 22511.55 or subdivision (b) or (c) of Section 22511.59 to verify the authenticity of the certificates and information submitted in support of those applications. The department shall seek the cooperation of the Medical Board of California or the appropriate regulatory boards in conducting the audits.

(b) The audit provisions of subdivision (a) only apply to those applications that were initially submitted to the department after January 1, 2001.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 485, Sec. 1.   (SB 611)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 2. Department of the California Highway Patrol [2100. - 2482.]



  ARTICLE 1. Administration [2100. - 2114.]

2100.

There is in the Transportation Agency the Department of the California Highway Patrol.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 352, Sec. 520.   (AB 1317)   Effective September 26, 2013.   Operative July 1, 2013, by Sec. 543 of Ch. 352.)
-------------------------------------------

2101.

As used in this chapter, “department” means the Department of the California Highway Patrol.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

2102.

Wherever in any statute “California Highway Patrol” is used, it means the Department of the California Highway Patrol.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

2103.

The department is the successor to and is vested with the duties, powers, purposes, responsibilities, and jurisdiction of the former Division of Enforcement of the Department of Motor Vehicles, known as the California Highway Patrol, and of the officers and employees thereof.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

2104.

The department has possession and control of all records, books, papers, offices, or equipment, and all other property, real or personal, now or hereafter held for the benefit or use of the former Division of Enforcement of the Department of Motor Vehicles, known as the California Highway Patrol.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

2105.

Except as in this chapter otherwise provided, the provisions of Chapter 2 (commencing at Section 11150) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code shall govern and apply to the conduct of the department in every respect the same as if the provisions were set forth in this code, and wherever in that chapter the term “head of the department” or similar designation occurs, for the purposes of this division, it shall mean the commissioner.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

2106.

The department shall maintain its main office within 20 miles of Sacramento.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 9, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

2107.

The department is under the control of a civil executive officer, known as the Commissioner of the California Highway Patrol. The commissioner shall be appointed by the Governor with the advice and consent of the Senate to serve at the pleasure of the Governor, and shall have resided within the state continuously for at least five years immediately preceding appointment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 133, Sec. 103.   (SB 272)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

2108.

The commissioner shall perform all duties, exercise all powers and jurisdiction, assume and discharge all responsibilities, and carry out and effect all purposes vested by law in the department.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the commissioner may administratively determine the geographic area of residence of any member of the department in order to assure the availability of such member for emergency service and the discharge of departmental responsibilities.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1231.)
-------------------------------------------

2109.

The commissioner shall organize the department with the approval of the Governor and the Secretary of Transportation and may arrange and classify the work of the department and may, with the approval of the Governor and the Secretary of Transportation, create or abolish divisions thereof.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 352, Sec. 521.   (AB 1317)   Effective September 26, 2013.   Operative July 1, 2013, by Sec. 543 of Ch. 352.)
-------------------------------------------

2110.

The Assistant Commissioner of the California Highway Patrol shall be appointed by the commissioner, subject to the approval of the Governor, pursuant to the provisions of Article XXIV of the State Constitution.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 268, Sec. 32.4.   Effective June 30, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

2111.

The assistant commissioner shall carry out and execute such duties, with respect to traffic law enforcement, as may be specified by the commissioner.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

2112.

The chief administrative officer of the department shall be appointed by the commissioner subject to the approval of the Governor, pursuant to the provisions of Article XXIV of the State Constitution.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 268, Sec. 32.5.   Effective June 30, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

2113.

The chief administrative officer shall carry out and execute such duties with respect to the administrative affairs of the department as may be specified by the commissioner.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

2114.

The department may pay membership fees, join, and participate in the affairs of associations having for their purpose the interchange of information relating to law enforcement, accident prevention, and subjects related to the powers and duties of the department.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. The California Highway Patrol [2250. - 2269.]

2250.

The California Highway Patrol in the Department of the California Highway Patrol consists of the following members: the commissioner, the deputy commissioner, assistant commissioners, chiefs, assistant chiefs, captains, lieutenants, sergeants, and officers.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 270, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

2250.1.

(a) The commissioner shall establish special designations of peace officers within the Department of the California Highway Patrol to assist in the transfer of responsibilities from the California State Police Division to the Department of the California Highway Patrol. The peace officers so designated include all peace officers of the former California State Police Division on July 11, 1995. These specially designated peace officers are peace officers as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 830.2 of the Penal Code.

(b) Peace officers designated in subdivision (a) shall become members of the Department of the California Highway Patrol, as described in Section 2250, by meeting the training requirements and qualifications for those positions as established pursuant to Section 19818.6 of the Government Code or with the approval of the State Personnel Board Executive Officer.

(c) Individuals granted reemployment or reinstatement on or after July 12, 1995, to peace officer positions formerly within the California State Police Division shall be reinstated to the peace officer designations established by the commissioner pursuant to this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 305, Sec. 65.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

2251.

All promotions to the classes of deputy chief, assistant chief, captain, lieutenant, and sergeant shall be made from promotional eligible lists resulting from promotional examination of persons in the next lower class.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 615.)
-------------------------------------------

2252.

Such specialized positions as shall be designated by the commissioner with the approval of the Personnel Board shall be filled pursuant to open competitive examinations held pursuant to law.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

2253.

For the purpose of determining the scope of employment of any member of the California Highway Patrol under the workers’ compensation laws, any such member shall be deemed to be on duty and acting within the scope of the person’s employment when actually exercising any of the powers or performing any of the duties imposed or authorized by law at any time during the 24 hours of the day.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 1454.)
-------------------------------------------

2254.

In the event any dispute arises between the department and any of its members in an industrial disability case, such member or his attorney, upon demand, shall be entitled to examine any record of the department or of the State Compensation Insurance Fund which has any bearing on said case.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

2255.

No member of the California Highway Patrol, appointed to serve in any county, shall be assigned by the commissioner for service outside the county for a longer period than one week, except:

(a) Pursuant to a request by the employee for a transfer.

(b) As may be necessitated by temporary traffic emergencies requiring an increase in the number of patrol members in one locality or seasonal changes making expedient a decrease in the number of patrol members in one locality, but in such latter events no assignment shall be made for disciplinary purposes.

An assignment under this section shall be made by the commissioner.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

2256.

Notwithstanding Section 18932 of the Government Code, the minimum age limit for appointment to the position of entry level peace officer of the Department of the California Highway Patrol, shall be 21 years, and the maximum age limit for examination shall be 35 years.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 162, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

2257.

The commissioner shall issue to each member of the California Highway Patrol a badge of authority with the seal of the State of California in the center thereof, the words “California Highway Patrol” encircling the seal and below the designation of the position held by each member to whom issued.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

2258.

Neither the commissioner nor any other person shall issue a badge to any person who is not a duly appointed member of the California Highway Patrol.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

2259.

The Department of the California Highway Patrol shall pay to the member, or his estate, the cost of repairing the uniforms and equipment of the member of the California Highway Patrol which are damaged in the line of duty. If the uniforms or equipment are damaged beyond repair, the department shall pay an amount equal to the actual value thereof at the time the damage occurred, which shall be determined by the commissioner.

The term “equipment,” as used in this section, shall include equipment required by the department or personal accoutrements necessary for the patrol member to perform his duty.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1473.)
-------------------------------------------

2259.5.

The commissioner shall make certified bulletproof vests available to members of the California Highway Patrol while engaged in enforcement activities. The commissioner may make the equipment available to the remainder of the personnel of the California Highway Patrol. The equipment shall remain the property of the Department of the California Highway Patrol and shall be returned upon request of the commissioner. This section shall not be construed to require that the commissioner provide one certified bulletproof vest for each member of the California Highway Patrol. It is the intent of this section that a sufficient number of vests be available for the use of members of the California Highway Patrol while engaged in
 enforcement activities. The vests may be passed from one shift to another in the interests of economy.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 133, Sec. 104.   (SB 272)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

2260.

The commissioner may advance the cost of, or obtain and furnish, one complete uniform, including such items of clothing and equipment as may be required by the commissioner, to each new member of the California Highway Patrol hereafter employed. The cost to the commissioner shall be deducted from the salary of such member in installments within the first year after he has completed the training school.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

2261.

A uniform substantially similar to the official uniform of members of the California Highway Patrol shall not be worn by any other law enforcement officer or by any other person except duly appointed members of the California Highway Patrol and persons authorized by the commissioner to wear such uniform in connection with a program of entertainment. A uniform shall be deemed substantially similar to the uniform of the California Highway Patrol if it so resembles such official uniform as to cause an ordinary reasonable person to believe that the person wearing the uniform is a member of the California Highway Patrol.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1968, Ch. 1192.)
-------------------------------------------

2262.

The commissioner shall establish a school for the training and education of the members of the California Highway Patrol, and for other employees of the department deemed necessary, in traffic regulation, in the performance of their duties, and in the proper enforcement of this code and laws respecting use of the highways. The commissioner may contract with any county, city, district, or other subdivision of the state for the use of school facilities in the training of enforcement officers.
